Arkansas, session 2025, HB1401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-2705(b), concerning the excluded
services within the Medicaid provider-led organized care system, is amended
to read as follows:
(b) The Medicaid provider-led organized care system shall be
implemented to the extent possible, but shall not include the following
services when provided to enrollable Medicaid beneficiary populations:
(1) Nonemergency medical transportation in a capitated program;
(2) Dental benefits in a capitated program;
(3) School-based services provided by school employees;
(4) Skilled nursing facility services;
(5) Assisted living facility services;
(6) Human development center services; or
(7)(6) Waiver services provided to adults with physical
disabilities through the ARChoices in Homecare program or the Arkansas
IndependentChoices program.

*JMB087*
02/04/2025 1:11:26 PM JMB087